Utah statutes.
58-39a-4.   Certification and recognition of certification by other states.

(1)  The division shall issue to individuals qualified under the provisions of this chapter a certificate in the appropriate types of ADR provider as specified under Title 58, Chapter 39a.

(2)  The division in collaboration with the board shall establish standards and procedures for authorization of ADR providers certified in other states to practice in Utah.

